North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 3. Cemeteries for Inmates of County Homes.

§ 65-5.
County commissioners may establish new cemeteries.

The boards of county commissioners of the various counties in the State are authorized and empowered to locate and establish new graveyards or cemeteries upon the lands of their respective counties for the burial of the inmates of the county homes.

History.

1917, c. 151, s. 1; C.S., s. 5022.

§ 65-6.
Removal and reinterment of bodies.

Whenever the county commissioners have established new graveyards or cemeteries, they are authorized and empowered to remove to such graveyards or cemeteries all bodies of deceased inmates of the county homes.

History.

1917, c. 151, s. 2; C.S., s. 5023.